Utah statutes.
72-4-105.   Designation of state highways in municipalities.

If the route of a state highway extends into or through a municipality and the Legislature has not specifically designated the location of the highway within the municipality, the commission, in cooperation with the municipality, shall designate the streets of the municipality over which the state highway shall be routed.   The designated streets shall be part of the state highway system without compensation to the municipality.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 270, 1998 General Session

